Hawaii statutes.
§612-56 Grand jury counsel;
disqualification. (a) Grand jury counsel shall disqualify oneself in any
matter in which circumstances render substantial question upon the counsel's
impartiality or which would jeopardize public confidence in the grand jury.

(b) The prosecutor may petition the court for
disqualification of the grand jury counsel for cause. Upon a hearing, the
court shall issue an appropriate order permitting or denying such petition. [L
1980, c 209, §7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next